tests/russian.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Vowel harmony in Russian words, -ство": 
    искусство<n><nom> : искусство
    искусство<n><par> : искусствота
    искусство<n><dat> : искусствоҕа
    искусство<n><acc> : искусствоны
    искусство<n><abl> : искусствоттан
    искусство<n><ins> : искусствонан

    искусство<n><px3sp><nom> : искусствота
    искусство<n><px3sp><par> : искусствотына
    искусство<n><px3sp><dat> : искусствотыгар
    искусство<n><px3sp><acc> : искусствотын
    искусство<n><px3sp><abl> : искусствотыттан
    искусство<n><px3sp><ins> : искусствотынан

  "Vowel harmony in Russian words, -ение":
    отделение<n><nom> : отделение
    отделение<n><par> : отделениета
    отделение<n><dat> : отделениеҕа
    отделение<n><acc> : отделениены
    отделение<n><abl> : отделениеттан
    отделение<n><ins> : отделениенан

    отделение<n><px3sp><nom> : отделениета
    отделение<n><px3sp><par> : отделениетына
    отделение<n><px3sp><dat> : отделениетыгар
    отделение<n><px3sp><acc> : отделениетын
    отделение<n><px3sp><abl> : отделениетыттан
    отделение<n><px3sp><ins> : отделениетынан

  "Final voiced consonants are unvoiced":
    колхоз<n><nom> : колхоз
    колхоз<n><dat> : колхозка
    колхоз<n><pl><nom> : колхозтар
    колхоз<n><pl><dat> : колхозтарга

  "Vowel harmony in Russian words: е followed by cons":
    университет<n><nom> : университет
    университет<n><dat> : университетка
    университет<n><dat> : университеткэ
    университет<n><pl><nom> : университеттар
    университет<n><pl><dat> : университеттарга
    университет<n><px3sp><dat> : университетыгар
    университет<n><px3sp><acc> : университетын

  "Russian loans ending in consonant cluster with т":
    департамент<n><nom> : департамент
    департамент<n><par> : департамента
    департамент<n><px3sp><nom> : департамена
    коммунист<n><nom> : коммунист
    коммунист<n><pl><nom> : коммунистар
    субъект<n><nom> : субъект
    субъект<n><px3sp><nom> : субъега
    субъект<n><pl><nom> : субъектар
    спорт<n><dat> : спорка
    спорт<n><comp> : спортааҕар
    спорт<n><px3sp><nom> : спорду
    спорт<n><acc> : спорду

  "Misc nouns":
    музей<n><pl><nom> : музейдар
    музей<n><acc> : музейы
    музей<n><com> : музейдыын
    музей<n><comp> : музейдааҕар
    
    гражданин<n><pl><nom> : гражданиннар
    гражданин<n><acc> : гражданины
    гражданин<n><com> : гражданинныын
    гражданин<n><comp> : гражданиннааҕар
    
    туризм<n><pl><nom> : туризмнар
    туризм<n><acc> : туризмы
    туризм<n><com> : туризмныын
    туризм<n><comp> : туризымнааҕар
    
    инженер<n><pl><nom> : инженердар
    инженер<n><acc> : инженеры
    инженер<n><com> : инженердыын
    инженер<n><comp> : инженердааҕар
    
    режиссер<n><pl><nom> : режиссердар
    режиссер<n><acc> : режиссеры
    режиссер<n><com> : режиссердыын
    режиссер<n><comp> : режиссердааҕар
    
    правительство<n><pl><nom> : правительстволар
    правительство<n><acc> : правительствоны
    правительство<n><com> : правительстволыын
    правительство<n><comp> : правительстволааҕар
